src/closed-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON JUSTDUHÁT				!^N^
tuvsán UNDERTUVSÁN ;  	!^N^
tuvsán+Num:tuvsán TUVSÁN ; ! Case infl of tuvsán	!^N^
tuvsánat+A+Ord:tuvsána TUVSÁNAT ;			!^N^
duhát UNDERTUVSÁN ;  	!^N^
duhát:duhád TUVSÁN ; ! Case infl of duhát	!^N^
duhádat+A+Ord:duháda TUVSÁNAT ;			!^N^




! Justtuvsán, for numerals going via 1000
! -------------------------------------

LEXICON JUSTTUVSÁN				!^N^
tuvsána UNDERTUVSÁN ;  ! Thousand-and-something	!^N^
tuvsán:tuvsán TUVSÁN ; ! Case infl of tuvsán	!^N^
tuvsánat+A+Ord:tuvsána TUVSÁNAT ;			!^N^
duháda UNDERTUVSÁN ;  ! Thousand-and-something	!^N^
duhát:duhád TUVSÁN ; ! Case infl of duhát	!^N^
duhádat+A+Ord:duháda TUVSÁNAT ;			!^N^


! Old, for the old counting thirteen hundred etc.	
! -----------------------------------------------

LEXICON OLD					!^N^
akta NLX ;					!^N^	
guokta NLX ;					!^N^
gålmmå NLX ;					!^N^
niellja NLX ;					!^N^
vihtta NLX ;					!^N^
guhtta NLX ;					!^N^
gietjav NLX ;					!^N^
gáktsa NLX ;					!^N^
aktse NLX ;					!^N^
lågenanakta GTJUODE ;					!^N^	
lågenanguokta GTJUODE ;					!^N^
lågenangålmmå GTJUODE ;					!^N^
lågenanniellja GTJUODE ;					!^N^
lågenanvihtta GTJUODE ;					!^N^
lågenanguhtta GTJUODE ;					!^N^
lågenangietjav GTJUODE ;					!^N^
lågenangáktsa GTJUODE ;					!^N^
lågenanaktse GTJUODE ;					!^N^

LEXICON NLX					!^N^
lågenan GTJUODE ;				!^N^




LEXICON UNDERTUVSÁN				!^N^
AKTAF ;     ! 1				!^N^
2TO9F ;     ! 2-9			!^N^
LÅGEVF ;     ! 10				!^N^
LÅGENAN ;   ! 11-19             !^N^
2TO9LÅG ;   ! 20-99				!^N^
TJUOHTE ;     ! 100-199				!^N^
2TO9TJUO ;   ! 200-999				!^N^

LEXICON AKTAF					!^N^
akta AKTA ;        !^N^
akta:åvtå ÅVTÅ ;		!^N^
vuostasj+A+Ord:vuostatj VUOSTASJ ;			 !^N^


LEXICON 2TO9F					!^N^ 
guokta:guokt GUOKTA ;                 !^N^ 
nubbe+A+Ord:nupp nubbecase ;		!^N^ 
nubbe+A+Ord+Sg+Nom:nubbe K ;        !^N^ 
nubbe+A+Ord+Ess:nubben K ;         !^N^ 
nubbe+A+Ord+Sg+Ill:nubbáj K ;       !^N^ 
nubbe+A+Ord+Sg+Gen:nubbáj NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;       !^N^ ^C^ 
nuppát+A+Ord:nuppád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
gålmmå GÅLMMÅ ;       !^N^ 
goalmát+A+Ord:goalmád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
niellja:niellj GUOKTA ;             !^N^ 
nælját+A+Ord:næljád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
vihtta+Num:vidá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;                    !^N^
vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:vihtta K ;          !^N^
vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:vihtta K ;         !^N^
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:vihttaj K ;         !^N^
vihtta+Num+Ess:vihttan K ;            !^N^
vidát+A+Ord:vidád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
guhtta+Num:gudá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;               !^N^ 
guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:guhtta K ;          !^N^
guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:guhtta K ;         !^N^
guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:guhttaj K ;         !^N^
guhtta+Num+Ess:guhttan K ;            !^N^
gudát+A+Ord:gudád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
gietjav:giehtja GIETJAV ;        !^N^ 
giehttjit+A+Ord:giehttjid3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
gáktsa:gákts GÁKTSA ;              !^N^
gávtsát+A+Ord:gávtsád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
aktse:akts AKTSE ;                      !^N^
avtsát+A+Ord:avtsád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 


LEXICON LÅGEVF					!^N^
lågev:låhk LÅGEV ;   !^N^
lågåt+A+Ord:lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;			!^N^
låhke:låhk  TJUOHTECASE ; !^N^ 
låhke+Num+Sg+Ill:låhkåj K ;            !^N^

LEXICON LÅK-					!^N^
låk AKTAF ;				!^N^ !XXXlong form too?
låk 2TO9F ;				!^N^ !XXXlong form too?
låhke+Num+Sg+Nom:låk K ;         !^N^
låhke+Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:låk K ;         !^N^
låhke+Num+Sg+Gen:låk NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;      !^N^ ^C^
låhke+Num+Sg+Gen:låge NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;      !^N^ ^C^
låhke:låhk  TJUOHTECASE ; !^N^ ! vihttalåhke, collective number
låhke+Num+Sg+Ill:låhkåj K ;            !^N^
lågåt+A+Ord:lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;			!^N^

LEXICON 2TO9LÅG					!^N^
guokta LÅK- ;					!^N^
gålmmå LÅK- ;					!^N^
niellja LÅK- ;				!^N^
vihtta LÅK- ;					!^N^
guhtta LÅK- ;					!^N^
gietjav LÅK- ;					!^N^
gáktsa LÅK- ;					!^N^
aktse LÅK- ;					!^N^

LEXICON TJUOHTE					!^N^
tjuohte:tjuoht TJUOHTECASE ;    !^N^
tjuohte+Num+Sg+Ill:tjuohtáj K ; !^N^ 
tjuohte+Num+Sg+Nom:tjuohte NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; !^N^  ^C^
!čuohti:čuođi OVERTUVSÁN ;			!^N^
tjuohte LÅGEVF ;					!^N^ !to LÅK- too?
tjuohte 2TO9LÅG ;					!^N^
tjuohte AKTAF ;					!^N^
tjuohte 2TO9F ;					!^N^
tjuohte LÅGENAN ;				!^N^
tjuodát+A+Ord:tjuodád3 VUOSTASJ ;			!^N^


LEXICON 2TO9TJUO					!^N^
guokta GTJUODE ;					!^N^
gålmmå GTJUODE ;					!^N^
niellja GTJUODE ;				!^N^
njeallja GTJUODE ;				!^N^
vihtta GTJUODE ;					!^N^
guhtta GTJUODE ;					!^N^
gietjav GTJUODE ;					!^N^
gáktsa GTJUODE ;					!^N^
aktse GTJUODE ;					!^N^


LEXICON GTJUODE					!^N^
!čuođi OVERTUVSÁN ;				!^N^
tjuode+Num+Sg+Gen:tjuode NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; !^N^ ^C^
tjuode LÅGEVF ;					!^N^ !to LÅK- too?
tjuode 2TO9LÅG ;					!^N^
tjuode AKTAF ;					!^N^
tjuode 2TO9F ;					!^N^
tjuode LÅGENAN ;				!^N^
tjuohte:tjuoht TJUOHTECASE ;    !^N^  ! imprecise number
tjuodát+A+Ord:tjuodád3 VUOSTASJ ;			!^N^


! Case forms of the basic digits
! ------------------------------

LEXICON AKTA                !^N^
+Num: AKTA-NIE ;               !^N^
+Num:Q1 AKTA-OBL ;              !^N^

LEXICON AKTA-NIE                !^N^
 +Sg+Nom: K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;              !^N^
 +Ess:n K ;                 !^N^

LEXICON AKTA-OBL                !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;        !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;             !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Nom: K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j K ;               !^N^
 
LEXICON ÅVTÅ                 !^N^
+Num+Sg+Gen: K ;             !^N^
+Num+Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;        !^N^ ^C^
+Num+Sg+Acc:v K ;            !^N^
+Num+Sg+Ine:n K ;            !^N^
+Num+Sg+Ela:s K ;            !^N^
+Num+Sg+Com:jn K ;           !^N^
+Num+Sg+Par:t K ;            !^N^
+Num+Pl+Nom: K ;             !^N^
+Num+Pl+Gen:j K ;            !^N^
+Num+Pl+Acc:jt K ;           !^N^
+Num+Pl+Ill:jda K ;          !^N^
+Num+Pl+Ine:jn K ;           !^N^
+Num+Pl+Ela:js K ;           !^N^
+Num+Pl+Com:j K ;            !^N^

LEXICON GUOKTA                  !^N^
+Num:eQ1 GUOVTE- ;               !^N^
+Num:iQ1 GUOVTI- ;               !^N^
+Num: GUOKTA- ;                 !^N^

LEXICON GUOVTE-             !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;        !^N^  ^C^
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;             !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;             !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Nom: K ;              !^N^
 
LEXICON GUOVTI- 
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;           !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j K ;             !^N^


LEXICON GUOKTA-          !^N^  
 +Sg+Nom:a K ;           !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;           !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:áj K ;          !^N^
 +Ess:an K ;             !^N^
                         
LEXICON GÅLMMÅ           !^N^
+Num: GÅLMMÅ-NAIE ;      !^N^
+Num:Q1 GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;     !^N^
                        
LEXICON GÅLMMÅ-NAIE      !^N^
 +Sg+Nom: K ;            !^N^
 +Sg+Acc: K ;            !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;           !^N^
 +Ess:n K ;              !^N^
                         
LEXICON GÅLMMÅ-OBL       !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: K ;            !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;        !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;           !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;           !^N^
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;          !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t K ;           !^N^
 +Pl+Nom: K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;           !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;          !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;         !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;          !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;          !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j K ;           !^N^


LEXICON GIETJAV             !^N^
+Num: GIETJAV-IE ;          !^N^
+Num:Q1 GIETJAV-OBL ;       !^N^
                            
LEXICON GIETJAV-IE          !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;              !^N^
 +Ess:n K ;                 !^N^
                        

LEXICON LÅGENAN					!^N^
lågenan#akta AKTA ;        !^N^
lågenan#akta:lågenan#åvtå ÅVTÅ ;		!^N^
lågenan#guokta:lågenan#guokt GUOKTA ;          !^N^ 
lågenan#gålmmå GÅLMMÅ ;       !^N^
lågenan#niellja:lågenan#niellj GUOKTA ;      !^N^ 
lågenan#vihtta+Num:lågenan#vidá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;             !^N^
lågenan#guhtta+Num:lågenan#gudá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;         !^N^ 
lågenan#gietjav:lågenan#giehtja GIETJAV ;       !^N^ 
